dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- वन्; वन; 3 -->
    <pardef n="वन/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँछस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुँ; हुँ; 8 -->
    <pardef n="हुँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ला</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दैछ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दैन</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाल्; हाल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="हाल/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाल्; हाल; 10 -->
    <pardef n="हाल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छेस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िरहेछौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रहर; रहर; 2 -->
    <pardef n="रहर__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फस्टाउ; फस्टाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फस्टाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जन; जन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बत्; बत; 3 -->
    <pardef n="बत/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउनु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाइए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बनाइ; बनाइ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बनाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बेच; बेच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बेच__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम; सम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गर्नु; गर्नु; 5 -->
    <pardef n="गर्नु__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सब; सब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सब__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भन्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बनाउ; बनाउ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बनाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बनाए; बनाए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बनाए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नपाइँ; नपाइँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नपाइँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="वन्"><i>वन</i><par n="वन/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुँ"><i>हुँ</i><par n="हुँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हाल्"><i>हाल</i><par n="हाल/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="हाल्"><i>हाल</i><par n="हाल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रहर"><i>रहर</i><par n="रहर__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फस्टाउ"><i>फस्टाउ</i><par n="फस्टाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जन"><i>जन</i><par n="जन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बत्"><i>बत</i><par n="बत/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बनाइ"><i>बनाइ</i><par n="बनाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बेच"><i>बेच</i><par n="बेच__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सम"><i>सम</i><par n="सम__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्नु"><i>गर्नु</i><par n="गर्नु__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सब"><i>सब</i><par n="सब__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बनाउ"><i>बनाउ</i><par n="बनाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बनाए"><i>बनाए</i><par n="बनाए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नपाइँ"><i>नपाइँ</i><par n="नपाइँ__vblex"/></e>
